California statutes. Penal Code
 manner other than that specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1560 of the Evidence Code. When a defendant has issued a subpoena to a person or entity that is not a party for the production of books, papers, documents, or records, or copies thereof, the court may order an in camera hearing to determine whether or not the defense is entitled to receive the documents. The court may not order the documents disclosed to the prosecution except as required by Section 1054.3.

(f) This section shall not be construed to prohibit obtaining books, papers, documents, or records with the consent of the person to whom the books, papers, documents, or records relate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 764, Sec. 6.   (SB 497)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1326.1.

(a) An order for the production of utility records in whatever form and however stored shall be issued by a judge only upon a written ex parte application by a peace officer showing specific and articulable facts that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the records or information sought are relevant and material to an ongoing investigation of a felony violation of Section 186.10 or of any felony subject to the enhancement set forth in Section 186.11. The ex parte application shall specify with particularity the records to be produced, which shall be only those of the individual or individuals who are the subject of the criminal investigation. The ex parte application and any subsequent judicial order shall be open to the public as a judicial record unless ordered sealed by the court, for a period of 60 days. The sealing of these records may be extended for 60-day periods upon a showing to the court that it is necessary for the continuance of the investigation. Sixty-day extensions may continue for up to one year or until termination of the investigation of the individual or individuals, whichever is sooner. The records ordered to be produced shall be returned to the peace officer applicant or his or her designee within a reasonable time period after service of the order upon the holder of the utility records.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “utility records” include, but are not limited to, subscriber information, telephone or pager number information, toll call records, call detail records, automated message accounting records, billing statements, payment records, and applications for service in the custody of companies engaged in the business of providing telephone, pager, electric, gas, propane, water, or other like services. “Utility records” do not include the installation of, or the data collected from the installation of pen registers or trap-tracers, nor the contents of a wire or electronic communication.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the holder of the utility records from notifying a customer of the receipt of the order for production of records unless a court orders the holder of the utility records to withhold notification to the customer upon a finding that this notice would impede the investigation. Where a court has made an order to withhold notification to the customer under this subdivision, the peace officer or law enforcement agency who obtained the utility records shall notify the customer by delivering a copy of the ex parte order to the customer within 10 days of the termination of the investigation.

(d) No holder of utility records, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof, shall be liable to any person for (A) disclosing information in response to an order pursuant to this section, or (B) complying with an order under this section not to disclose to the customer, the order or the dissemination of information pursuant to the order.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the holder of the utility records from voluntarily disclosing information or providing records to law enforcement upon request.

(f) Utility records released pursuant to this section shall be used only for the purpose of criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 757, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1326.2.

(a) An order for the production of escrow or title records in whatever form and however stored shall be issued by a judge only upon a written ex parte application by a peace officer showing specific and articulable facts that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the records or information sought are relevant and material to an ongoing investigation of a felony violation of Section 186.10 or of any felony subject to the enhancement set forth in Section 186.11. The ex parte application shall specify with particularity the records to be produced, which shall be only those of the individual or individuals who are the subject of the criminal investigation. The ex parte application and any subsequent judicial order shall be open to the public as a judicial record unless ordered sealed by the court, for a period of 60 days. The sealing of these records may be extended for 60-day periods upon a showing to the court that it is necessary for the continuance of the investigation. Sixty-day extensions may continue for up to one year or until termination of the investigation of the individual or individuals, whichever is sooner. The records ordered to be produced shall be returned to the peace officer applicant or his or her designee within a reasonable time period after service of the order upon the holder of the escrow or title records.

(b) As used in subdivision (a), “holder of escrow or title records” means a title insurer that engages in the “business of title insurance,” as defined by Section 12340.3 of the Insurance Code, an underwritten title company, or an escrow company.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the holder of the escrow or title records from notifying a customer of the receipt of the order for production of records unless a court orders the holder of the escrow or title records to withhold notification to the customer upon a finding that this notice would impede the investigation. Where a court has made an order to withhold notification to the customer under this subdivision, the peace officer or law enforcement agency who obtained the escrow or title records shall notify the customer by delivering a copy of the ex parte order to the customer within 10 days of the termination of the investigation.

(d) No holder of escrow or title records, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof, shall be liable to any person for (A) disclosing information in response to an order pursuant to this section, or (B) complying with an order under this section not to disclose to the customer, the order or the dissemination of information pursuant to the order.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the holder of the escrow or title records from voluntarily disclosing information or providing records to law enforcement upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 757, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1327.

A subpoena authorized by Section 1326 shall be substantially in the following form:

The people of the State of California to A.B.:

You are commanded to appear before C.D., a judge of the ____ Court of ____ County, at (naming the place), on (stating the day and hour), as a witness in a criminal action prosecuted by the people of the State of California against E.F.

Given under my hand this ____ day of ____, A.D. 19____. G.H., Judge of the ____ Court (or “J.K., District Attorney,” or “J.K., District Attorney Investigator,” or “D.E., Public Defender,” or “D.E., Public Defender Investigator,” or “F.G., Defense Counsel,” or “By order of the court, L.M., Clerk,” or as the case may be).

If books, papers, or documents are required, a direction to the following effect must be contained in the subpoena: “And you are required, also, to bring with you the following” (describing intelligibly the books, papers, or documents required).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 403.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1328.

(a) A subpoena may be served by any person, except that the defendant may not serve a subpoena in the criminal action to which he or she is a party, but a peace officer shall serve in his or her county any subpoena delivered to him or her for service, either on the part of the people or of the defendant, and shall, without delay, make a written return of the service, subscribed by him or her, stating the time and place of service. The service is made by delivering a copy of the subpoena to the witness personally.

(b) (1) If service is to be made on a minor, service shall be made on the minor’s parent, guardian, conservator, or similar fiduciary, or if one of them
 cannot be located with reasonable diligence, then service shall be made on any person having the care or control of the minor or with whom the minor resides or by whom the minor is employed, unless the parent, guardian, conservator, or fiduciary or other specified person is the defendant, and on the minor if the minor is 12 years of age or older. The person served shall have the obligation of producing the minor at the time and place designated in the subpoena. A willful failure to produce the minor is punishable as a contempt pursuant to Section 1218 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The person served shall be allowed the fees and expenses that are provided for subpoenaed witnesses.

(2) If the minor is alleged to come within the description of Section 300, 601, or 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the minor is not residing with a parent or guardian, regardless of the age of the minor, service shall also be made upon the designated
 agent for service of process at the county child welfare department or the probation department under whose jurisdiction the child has been placed.

(3) The court having jurisdiction of the case shall have the power to appoint a guardian ad litem to receive service of a subpoena of the child and shall have the power to produce the child ordered to court under this section.

(c) If any peace officer designated in Section 830 is required as a witness before any court or magistrate in any action or proceeding in connection with a matter regarding an event or transaction which he or she has perceived or investigated in the course of his or her duties, a criminal subpoena issued pursuant to this chapter requiring his or her attendance may be served either by delivering a copy to the peace officer personally or by delivering two copies to his or her immediate superior or agent designated
 by his or her immediate superior to receive the service or, in those counties where the local agencies have consented with the district attorney’s office, marshal’s office, or sheriff’s office, where appropriate, to participate, by sending a copy by electronic means, including electronic mail, computer modem, facsimile, or other electronic means, to him or her personally, or to his or her immediate superior or agent designated by the immediate superior to receive the service. If the service is made by electronic means, the peace officer named in the subpoena, or his or her immediate superior or agency designated by his or her immediate superior shall acknowledge receipt of the subpoena by telephone or electronic means to the sender of origin. If service is made upon the immediate superior or agent designated by the immediate superior, the immediate superior or the agent shall deliver a copy of the subpoena to the peace officer as soon as possible and in no event later than a time which will enable the peace
 officer to comply with the subpoena.

(d) If the immediate superior or his or her designated agent upon whom service is attempted to be made knows he or she will be unable to deliver a copy of the subpoena to the peace officer within a time which will allow the peace officer to comply with the subpoena, the immediate superior or agent may refuse to accept service of process and is excused from any duty, liability, or penalty arising in connection with the service, upon notifying the server of that fact.

(e) If the immediate superior or his or her agent is tendered service of a subpoena less than five working days prior to the date of hearing, and he or she is not reasonably certain he or she can complete the service, he or she may refuse acceptance.

(f) If the immediate superior or agent upon whom service has been
 made, subsequently determines that he or she will be unable to deliver a copy of the subpoena to the peace officer within a time which will allow the peace officer to comply with the subpoena, the immediate superior or agent shall notify the server or his or her office or agent not less than 48 hours prior to the hearing date indicated on the subpoena, and is thereby excused from any duty, liability, or penalty arising because of his or her failure to deliver a copy of the subpoena to the peace officer. The server, so notified, is therewith responsible for preparing the written return of service and for notifying the originator of the subpoena if required.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), in the case of peace officers employed by the California Highway Patrol, if service is made upon the immediate superior or upon an agent designated by the immediate superior of the peace officer, the immediate superior or the agent shall deliver a copy of
 the subpoena to the peace officer on the officer’s first workday following acceptance of service of process. In this case, failure of the immediate superior or the designated agent to deliver the subpoena shall not constitute a defect in service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 59, Sec. 6.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1328.5.

Whenever any peace officer is a witness before any court or magistrate in any criminal action or proceeding in connection with a matter regarding an event or transaction which he has perceived or investigated in the course of his duties, where his testimony would become a matter of public record, and where he is required to state the place of his residence, he need not state the place of his residence, but in lieu thereof, he may state his business address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 636.)
-------------------------------------------

1328.6.

Whenever any criminalist, questioned document examiner, latent print analyst, polygraph examiner employed by the Department of Justice, a police department, a sheriff’s office, or a district attorney’s office, an intelligence specialist or other technical specialist employed by the Department of Justice, a custodial officer employed in a local detention facility, or an employee of the county welfare department or the department which administers the county public social services program, is a witness before any court or magistrate in any criminal action or proceeding in connection with a matter regarding an event or transaction which he or she has perceived or investigated in the course of his or her official duties, where his or her testimony would become a matter of public record, and where he or she is required to state the place of his or her residence, he or she need not state the place of his or her residence, but in lieu thereof, he or she may state his or her business address, unless the court finds, after an in camera hearing, that the probative value of the witness’s residential address outweighs the creation of substantial danger to the witness.

Nothing in this section shall abridge or limit a defendant’s right to discover or investigate this information. This section is not intended to apply to confidential informants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 535, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1328d.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 1328, except as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1328, a subpoena may be delivered by mail, messenger, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission. Service shall be effected when the witness acknowledges receipt of the subpoena to the sender, by telephone, by mail, over the internet by email or by completion of the sender’s online form, or in person, and identifies themselves by reference to their date of birth and driver’s license number or Department of Motor Vehicles identification card
 number. The sender shall make a written notation of the identifying information obtained during any acknowledgment by telephone or in person. The sender shall retain a copy of any acknowledgment received over the internet until the court date for which the subpoena was issued or until any further date as specified by the court. A subpoena issued and acknowledged pursuant to this section shall have the same force and effect as a subpoena personally served. Failure to comply with a subpoena issued and acknowledged pursuant to this section may be punished as a contempt and the subpoena may so state; provided, that a warrant of arrest or a body attachment may not be issued based upon a failure to appear after being subpoenaed pursuant to this section.

(b) A party requesting a continuance, based upon the failure of a
 witness to appear in court at the time and place required for their appearance or testimony pursuant to a subpoena, shall prove to the court that the party has complied with this section. That continuance shall only be granted for a period of time that would allow personal service of the subpoena and in no event longer than that allowed by law, including the requirements of Sections 861 and 1382.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 851, Sec. 4.   (SB 471)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.

(a) When a person attends before a magistrate, grand jury, or court, as a witness in a criminal case, whether upon a subpoena or in pursuance of an undertaking, or voluntarily, the court, at its discretion, if the attendance of the witness be upon a trial may by an order upon its minutes, or in any criminal proceeding, by a written order, direct the county auditor to draw his warrant upon the county treasurer in favor of such witness for witness’ fees at the rate of twelve dollars ($12) for each day’s actual attendance and for a reasonable sum to be specified in the order for the necessary expenses of such witness. The court, in its discretion, may make an allowance under this section, or under any appropriate section in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 68070), Title 8, of the Government Code, other than Section 68093. The allowances are county charges. 

(b) The court, in its discretion, may authorize payment to such a witness, if he is employed and if his salary is not paid by his employer during the time he is absent from his employment because of being such a witness, of a sum equal to his gross salary for such time, but such sum shall not exceed eighteen dollars ($18) per day. The sum is a county charge.

A person compensated under the provisions of this subdivision may not receive the payment of witness’ fees as provided for in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 184, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.1.

Any witness who is subpoenaed in any criminal action or proceeding shall be given written notice on the subpoena that the witness may be entitled to receive fees and mileage. Such notice shall indicate generally the manner in which a request or claim for fees and mileage should be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

1330.

No person is obliged to attend as a witness before a court or magistrate out of the county where the witness resides, or is served with the subpoena, unless the distance be less than 150 miles from his or her place of residence to the place of trial, or unless the judge of the court in which the offense is triable, or a justice of the Supreme Court, or a judge of a superior court, or, in the case of a minor concerning whom a petition has been filed pursuant to Article 16 (commencing with Section 650) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, by the judge of the juvenile court hearing the petition, upon an affidavit of the district attorney or prosecutor, or of the defendant, or his or her counsel, or in the case involving a minor in whose behalf a petition has been filed in the juvenile court, of the probation officer approving the filing of the petition or of any party to the action, or his or her counsel, stating that he or she believes the evidence of the witness is material, and his or her attendance at the examination, trial, or hearing is material and necessary, shall endorse on the subpoena an order for the attendance of the witness.

When a subpoena duces tecum is duly issued according to any other provision of law and is served upon a custodian of records or other qualified witness as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1560) of Chapter 2 of Division 11 of the Evidence Code, and his or her personal attendance is not required by the terms of the subpoena, the limitations of this section shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 86.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

Disobedience to a subpoena, or a refusal to be sworn or to testify as a witness, may be punished by the Court or magistrate as a contempt. A witness disobeying a subpoena issued on the part of the defendant, unless he show good cause for his nonattendance, is liable to the defendant in the sum of one hundred dollars, which may be recovered in a civil action.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.5.

Any person who is subpoenaed to appear at a session of court, or at the trial of an issue therein, may, in lieu of appearance at the time specified in the subpoena, agree with the party at whose request the subpoena was issued, to appear at another time or upon such notice as may be agreed upon. Any failure to appear pursuant to such agreement may be punished as a contempt, and a subpoena shall so state. The facts establishing such agreement and the failure to appear may be shown by the affidavit of any person having personal knowledge of the facts and the court may grant such continuance as may be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 878 to 883, inclusive, when the court is satisfied, by proof on oath, that there is good cause to believe that any material witness for the prosecution or defense, whether the witness is an adult or a minor, will not appear and testify unless security is required, at any proceeding in connection with any criminal prosecution or in connection with a wardship petition pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may order the witness to enter into a written undertaking to the effect that he or she will appear and testify at the time and place ordered by the court or that he or she will forfeit an amount the court deems proper.

(b) If the witness required to enter into an undertaking to appear and testify, either with or without sureties, refuses compliance with the order for that purpose, the court may commit the witness, if an adult, to the custody of the sheriff, and if a minor, to the custody of the probation officer or other appropriate agency, until the witness complies or is legally discharged.

(c) When a person is committed pursuant to this section, he or she is entitled to an automatic review of the order requiring a written undertaking and the order committing the person, by a judge or magistrate having jurisdiction over the offense other than the one who issued the order. This review shall be held not later than two days from the time of the original order of commitment.

(d) If it is determined that the witness must remain in custody, the witness is entitled to a review of that order after 10 days.

(e) When a witness has entered into an undertaking to appear, upon his or her failure to do so the undertaking is forfeited in the same manner as undertakings of bail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 87.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3a. Attendance of Witnesses Outside the State [1334. - 1334.6.]

1334.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Act to Secure the Attendance of Witnesses from without the State in Criminal Cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Witness” includes any person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in any criminal action, prosecution, or proceeding.

(b) “State” means any State or Territory of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(c) “Grand jury investigation” means any grand jury investigation which has commenced or is about to commence.

(d) “Per diem” means a sum of money the purpose of which is to provide for personal expenses, including, but not limited to, food and lodging.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f), if a judge of a court of record in any state, which by its laws provides for commanding persons within that state to attend and testify in this state, issues a certificate under the seal of the court that there is a criminal prosecution pending in the court, or that there is a grand jury investigation, that a person within this state is a material witness in that prosecution or grand jury investigation, and that their presence will be required for a specified number of days, then, upon presentation of the certificate to a judge of a court of record in the county in which the person is, a time and place for a hearing shall be fixed by the judge and the judge shall make an order directing the witness to appear at the hearing.

(b) If, at the hearing, the judge determines that the witness is material and necessary, that it will not cause undue hardship to the witness to be compelled to attend and testify in the prosecution or grand jury investigation in the other state, and that the laws of the state in which the prosecution is pending or in which there is a grand jury investigation will give to the witness protection from arrest and service of civil and criminal process and will furnish in advance to the witness the sum of ten cents ($0.10) for each mile necessarily traveled if the witness elects surface travel or the minimum round trip scheduled airline fare plus twenty cents ($0.20) a mile for necessary surface travel at either end of the flight if the witness elects air travel, and, except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1334.3, a per diem of twenty dollars ($20) for each day that they are required to travel and attend as a witness and that the judge of the
 court in which the witness is ordered to appear will order the payment of witness fees authorized by law for each day the witness is required to attend the court plus reimbursement for any additional expenses of the witness which the judge of the court in which the witness is ordered to appear shall find reasonable and necessary, the judge shall issue a subpoena, with a copy of the certificate attached, directing the witness to attend and testify in the court where the prosecution is pending, or where the grand jury investigation is, at a time and place specified in the subpoena. In any of these hearings the certificate shall be prima facie evidence of all the facts stated therein.

(c) If the certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state to assure the witness’ attendance therein, the judge may, in lieu of notification of the hearing, direct that the witness be
 forthwith brought before the judge for the hearing.

(d) If the judge at the hearing is satisfied of the desirability of the custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof of this desirability, the judge may, in lieu of issuing a subpoena, order that the witness be forthwith taken into custody and delivered to an officer of the requesting state.

(e) If the witness, who is subpoenaed as provided in this section, after being paid or tendered by some properly authorized person the sum or fare, and per diem set forth in this section, fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the subpoena, the witness shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a subpoena issued from a court of record in this state.

(f) A judge shall
 not issue an order directing a witness to appear pursuant to this section if the criminal prosecution is based on the laws of another state that authorize a criminal penalty to an individual performing, receiving, supporting, or aiding in the performance or receipt of sexual or reproductive health care, including, but not limited to, an abortion, contraception, or gender-affirming care if the sexual or reproductive health care is lawful under the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 260, Sec. 17.   (SB 345)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.3.

(a) If a person in any state, which by its laws has made provision for commanding persons within its borders to attend and testify in criminal prosecutions or grand jury investigations in this state, is a material witness in a prosecution pending in a court of record in this state, or in a grand jury investigation, a judge of such court may issue a certificate under the seal of the court stating these facts and specifying the number of days the witness will be required. This certificate shall be presented to a judge of a court of record in the county of such other state in which the witness is found.

If the certificate recommends that the witness be taken into immediate custody and delivered to an officer of this state to assure his or her attendance in this state, the judge may direct that the witness be forthwith brought before him or her. If the judge is satisfied of the desirability of the custody and delivery, for which determination the certificate shall be prima facie proof, he or she may order that the witness be forthwith taken into custody and delivered to an officer of this state. This order shall be sufficient authority to the officer to take the witness into custody and hold him or her unless and until he or she may be released by bail, recognizance, or order of the judge issuing the certificate.

If the witness is subpoenaed to attend and testify in this state, he or she shall be tendered the sum of ten cents ($0.10) for each mile necessarily traveled if the witness elects surface travel or the minimum round trip scheduled airlines fare plus twenty cents ($0.20) a mile for necessary surface travel at either end of the flight if the witness elects air travel, and except as provided in subdivision (b), a per diem of twenty dollars ($20) for each day that he or she is required to travel and attend as a witness. The judge of the court in which the witness is ordered to appear shall order the payment of witness fees authorized by law for each day the witness is required to attend the court plus reimbursement for any additional expenses of the witness which the judge of the court shall find reasonable and necessary. A witness who has appeared in accordance with the provisions of the subpoena shall not be required to remain within this state a longer period of time than the period mentioned in the certificate, unless otherwise ordered by the court. If the witness fails without good cause to attend and testify as directed in the subpoena, he or she shall be punished in the manner provided for the punishment of any witness who disobeys a subpoena issued from a court of record in this state.

(b) If the witness subpoenaed to attend and testify in this state is at the time he or she is required to appear and testify an inmate of a state prison, county jail, or other penal facility, the witness shall, while attending in this state as a witness, be furnished food and lodging in the jail or other appropriate penal facility in the county in which the witness is attending court, and food and lodging of that penal facility shall be rendered in lieu of the per diem specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.4.

If a person comes into this State in obedience to a subpoena directing him to attend and testify in this State, he shall not, while in this State pursuant to the subpoena or order, be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this State under the subpoena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.5.

If a person passes through this State while going to another State in obedience to a subpoena or order to attend and testify in that State or while returning therefrom, he shall not while so passing through this State be subject to arrest or the service of process, civil or criminal, in connection with matters which arose before his entrance into this State under the subpoena or order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.6.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the States which enact similar legislation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Examination of Witnesses Conditionally [1335. - 1345.]

1335.

(a) If a defendant has been charged with a public offense triable in a court, he or she in all cases, and the people in cases other than those for which the punishment may be death, may, if the defendant has been fully informed of his or her right to counsel as provided by law, have witnesses examined conditionally in his or her or their behalf, as prescribed in this chapter.

(b) If a defendant has been charged with a serious felony or in a case of domestic violence, the people or the defendant may, if the defendant has been fully informed of his or her right to counsel as provided by law, have a witness examined conditionally as prescribed in this chapter, if there is evidence that the life of the witness is in
 jeopardy.

(c) (1) If a defendant has been charged with human trafficking, pursuant to Section 236.1, and there is evidence that the victim or material witness has been or is being dissuaded by the defendant or a person acting on behalf of the defendant, by intimidation or physical threat, from cooperating with the prosecutor or testifying at trial, the people or the defendant may, if the defendant has been fully informed of his or her right to counsel as provided by law, have a witness examined conditionally as prescribed in this chapter.

(2) If a defendant has been charged with human trafficking, pursuant to Section 236.1, and the court finds that there is a reasonable basis to believe that the material witness will not attend the trial because he or she is under the direct control of the defendant or another person involved in human trafficking and, by
 virtue of this relationship, the defendant or other person seeks to prevent the witness or victim from testifying, and if the defendant has been fully informed of his or her right to counsel as provided by law, the court may have a witness examined conditionally as prescribed in this chapter.

 (d) If a defendant has been charged with a case of domestic violence and there is evidence that a victim or material witness has been or is being dissuaded by the defendant or a person acting on behalf of the defendant, by intimidation or a physical threat, from cooperating with the prosecutor or testifying at trial, the people or the defendant may, if the defendant has been fully informed of his or her right to counsel as provided by law, have a witness examined conditionally as prescribed in this chapter.

(e) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Domestic violence” means a public offense arising from acts of domestic violence as defined in Section 13700.

(2) “Serious felony” means a felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 or a violation of Section 11351, 11352, 11378, or 11379 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (AB 1610)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1336.

(a) When a material witness for the defendant, or for the people, is about to leave the state, or is so sick or infirm as to afford reasonable grounds for apprehension that he or she will be unable to attend the trial, or is a person 65 years of age or older, or a dependent adult, the defendant or the people may apply for an order that the witness be examined conditionally.

(b) When there is evidence that the life of a witness is in jeopardy, the defendant or the people may apply for an order that the witness be examined conditionally.

(c) As used in this section, “dependent adult” means a person, regardless of whether the person lives independently, who is
 between the ages of 18 and 65, who has physical or mental limitations which restrict his or her ability to carry out normal activities or to protect his or her rights, including, but not limited to, persons who have physical or developmental disabilities or whose physical or mental abilities have diminished because of age. “Dependent adult” includes any person between the ages of 18 and 65, who is admitted as an inpatient to a 24-hour facility, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 70, Sec. 4.   (AB 1934)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1337.

The application shall be made upon affidavit stating all of the following:

(a) The nature of the offense charged.

(b) The state of the proceedings in the action.

(c) The name and residence of the witness, and that his or her testimony is material to the defense or the prosecution of the action.

(d) That any of the following are true:

(1) The witness is about to leave the state, or is so sick or infirm as to afford reasonable grounds for apprehending that he or she will not be able to attend
 the trial, or is a person 65 years of age or older, or a dependent adult, or that the life of the witness is in jeopardy.

(2) That the witness is a victim or a material witness in a human trafficking case who has been or is being intimidated or threatened, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 1335, from cooperating with the prosecutor or testifying at trial.

(3) That the witness is a victim or material witness in a domestic violence case who has been or is being intimidated or threatened, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 1335 from cooperating with the prosecutor or testifying at trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.   (AB 1610)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1338.

The application may be made to the court or a judge thereof, and must be made upon three days’ notice to the opposite party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 540.)
-------------------------------------------

1339.
